District of Columbia statutes.
31-5331

Unfair methods of competition; unfair and deceptive acts and practices.

Every society authorized to do business in the District and its agents shall be subject to the provisions of law applicable to life, accident, and health insurers relating to unfair and deceptive practices; provided, however, that nothing in such provisions shall be construed as applying to or affecting the right of any society to determine its eligibility requirements for membership, or be construed as applying to or affecting the offering of benefits exclusively to members or persons eligible for membership in the society by a subsidiary corporation or affiliated organization of the society.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1232, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1261.